District of Columbia statutes.
1-306.36

Housing trust fund requirement.

Except as provided in § 1-306.37, if the applicant agrees to contribute funds to a housing trust fund, the amount of funds to be contributed shall be no less than the total of 1/2 of the assessed value of the total square footage of additional commercial office space.

Apr. 10, 1984, D.C. Law 5-76, § 3, 31 DCR 1049
Apr. 27, 1999, D.C. Law 12-275, § 2(a), 41 DCR 1498

History

This section is referenced in § 1-306.33.

Section References